District of Columbia statutes.
47-209

Items included in annual estimates — Employees, supplies and expenses for highway bridge and approaches.

Estimates in detail shall be submitted annually for salaries of employees, lighting, power, and miscellaneous supplies and expenses of every kind necessarily incident to the operation and maintenance of the highway bridge and approaches.

History

June 27, 1906, 34 Stat. 492, ch. 3553
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Cross References

Public roads and bridges, jurisdiction of mayor, see § 9-101.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-209.
1973 Ed., § 47-207.